Mississippi, session 2026, HB795.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the Board of Supervisors of Sharkey County, Mississippi, to assist in paying costs associated with the immediate replacement of the essential law enforcement vehicles of the Sharkey County Sheriff's Department, replacement of the department's law enforcement equipment and relocation of the department to a new facility for 911 operations and law enforcement functions for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027.............................. $ 1,000,000.00 SECTION 2.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.